Florida, session 2026, SB68.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSubsections (6) and (7) are added to section 28 395.1012, Florida Statutes, to read: 29 395.1012âPatient safety.â 30 (6)(a)âEach hospital with an emergency department shall: 31 1.âDevelop and implement policies and procedures for 32 pediatric patient care in the emergency department which reflect 33 evidence-based best practices relating to, at a minimum, all of 34 the following: 35 a.âTriage. 36 b.âMeasuring and recording vital signs. 37 c.âWeighing and recording weights in kilograms. 38 d.âCalculating medication dosages. 39 e.âUse of pediatric instruments. 40 2.âConduct training at least annually on the policies and 41 procedures developed under this subsection. The training must 42 include, at a minimum: 43 a.âThe use of pediatric instruments, as applicable to each 44 licensure type, using clinical simulation as defined in s. 45 464.003. 46 b.âDrills that simulate emergency situations. Each 47 emergency department must conduct drills at least annually. 48 (b)âEach hospital emergency department shall: 49 1.âDesignate a pediatric emergency care coordinator. The 50 pediatric emergency care coordinator must be a physician or a 51 physician assistant licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, a 52 nurse licensed under chapter 464, or a paramedic licensed under 53 chapter 401. The pediatric emergency care coordinator is 54 responsible for implementation of and ensuring adherence to the 55 policies and procedures adopted under this subsection. 56 2.âConduct the National Pediatric Readiness Assessment 57 developed by the National Pediatric Readiness Project, in 58 accordance with timelines established by the National Pediatric 59 Readiness Project. 60 (7)âEach hospital with an emergency department may conduct 61 the National Pediatric Readiness Projectâs Open Assessment 62 during a year in which the National Pediatric Readiness 63 Assessment is not conducted. 64 Section 2.âPresent subsections (4) through (19) of section 65 395.1055, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 66 through (20), respectively, a new subsection (4) is added to 67 that section, and paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of that 68 section is amended, to read: 69 395.1055âRules and enforcement.â 70 (1)âThe agency shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) 71 and 120.54 to implement the provisions of this part, which shall 72 include reasonable and fair minimum standards for ensuring that: 73 (c)âA comprehensive emergency management plan is prepared 74 and updated annually. Such standards must be included in the 75 rules adopted by the agency after consulting with the Division 76 of Emergency Management. At a minimum, the rules must provide 77 for plan components that address emergency evacuation 78 transportation; adequate sheltering arrangements; postdisaster 79 activities, including emergency power, food, and water; 80 postdisaster transportation; supplies; staffing; emergency 81 equipment; individual identification of residents and transfer 82 of records;, and responding to family inquiries and the needs of 83 pediatric and neonatal patients. The comprehensive emergency 84 management plan is subject to review and approval by the local 85 emergency management agency. During its review, the local 86 emergency management agency shall ensure that the following 87 agencies, at a minimum, are given the opportunity to review the 88 plan: the Department of Elderly Affairs, the Department of 89 Health, the Agency for Health Care Administration, and the 90 Division of Emergency Management. Also, appropriate volunteer 91 organizations must be given the opportunity to review the plan. 92 The local emergency management agency shall complete its review 93 within 60 days and either approve the plan or advise the 94 facility of necessary revisions. 95 (4)âThe agency, in consultation with the Florida Emergency 96 Medical Services for Children State Partnership Program, shall 97 adopt rules that establish minimum standards for pediatric 98 patient care in hospital emergency departments, including, but 99 not limited to, availability of and immediate access to 100 pediatric-specific equipment and supplies. 101 Section 3.âParagraph (n) is added to subsection (3) of 102 section 408.05, Florida Statutes, to read: 103 408.05âFlorida Center for Health Information and 104 Transparency.â 105 (3)âHEALTH INFORMATION TRANSPARENCY.âIn order to 106 disseminate and facilitate the availability of comparable and 107 uniform health information, the agency shall perform the 108 following functions: 109 (n)1.âCollect the overall assessment score of National 110 Pediatric Readiness Assessments conducted by hospital emergency 111 departments pursuant to s. 395.1012(6) from the Florida 112 Emergency Medical Services for Children State Partnership 113 Program by December 31, 2026, and by December 31 of each year in 114 in which the National Pediatric Readiness Assessment is 115 conducted thereafter. 116 2.âBy April 1, 2027, and by April 1 following each year in 117 which the National Pediatric Readiness Assessment is conducted 118 thereafter, publish the overall assessment score for each 119 hospital emergency department and provide a comparison to the 120 national average score when it becomes available. 121 3.âCollect and publish no more than one overall assessment 122 score per hospital, per year, of assessments conducted pursuant 123 to s. 395.1012(6) and provide a comparison to the hospital 124 emergency departmentâs most recently published score pursuant to 125 subparagraph 2. 126 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.